Idaho statutes. Title 23 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
Chapter 13
COUNTY OPTION KITCHEN AND TABLE WINE ACT

Sec.

§ 23-1301. Short title.

This act shall be known and designated as the “County Option Kitchen and Table Wine Act.”

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 1, p. 760.

§ 23-1302. Purpose and construction of act.

The purpose of this act is to regulate the importation, distribution and sale, both at wholesale and retail, of wines while reserving to each county of this state the right to prohibit the distribution or sale of wine within its borders. This act shall not be construed to affect laws regulating the retail sale of alcoholic beverages, nor shall it be construed to in any way enlarge the class of persons who may lawfully buy, possess or consume any variety of wine whatever its alcoholic content.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 2, p. 760; am. 2011, ch. 130, § 3, p. 363.

§ 23-1303. Definitions.

The following terms as used in this chapter are hereby defined as follows:

“Bonded wine warehouse” means a licensed warehouse within the state of Idaho that is solely authorized to store and handle wine.

“Bonded wine warehouse license” means a license that authorizes a bonded wine warehouse to solely store and handle wine. Handling of wine as provided for in this chapter includes the loading, unloading, and delivery of wine from a vintner or winery to a bonded wine warehouse, from a bonded wine warehouse to a vintner or winery, from a bonded wine warehouse to another bonded wine warehouse, or from a bonded wine warehouse to a distributor. A bonded wine warehouse license does not authorize the distribution or sale of wine.

“Dessert wine” means only those wines that contain more than sixteen percent (16%) alcohol by volume, but do not exceed twenty-four percent (24%) alcohol by volume, are grape-based, and are fortified through the addition of wine-based spirits or brandy made from grapes. Dessert wine as defined herein shall not be deemed to be a spirit-based beverage for the purposes of paragraph (i) of this subsection. Dessert wine as defined in this section shall not include aromatized wines such as vermouth, quinquina, and americano.

“Director” means the director of the Idaho state police.

“Distributor” means a person to whom a wine distributor’s license has been issued.

“Domestic produced product” means wine at least seventy-five percent (75%) of which by volume is derived from fruit or agricultural products grown in Idaho.

“Importer” means a person to whom a wine importer’s license has been issued.

“Live performance” means a performance occurring in a theater and not otherwise in violation of any provision of Idaho law.

“Low proof spirit beverages” means any alcoholic beverage containing not more than fourteen percent (14%) alcohol by volume obtained by distillation mixed with drinkable water, fruit juices and/or other ingredients in solution. These products shall be considered and taxed as wine. Spirit-based beverages exceeding fourteen percent (14%) alcohol by volume shall be considered as liquor and sold only through the division system.

“Person” includes an individual, firm, copartnership, association, corporation, or any group or combination acting as a unit, and includes the plural as well as the singular unless the intent to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the context in which it is used.

“Retailer” means a person to whom a retail wine license has been issued.

“Retail wine license” means a license issued by the director authorizing a person to sell table wine and/or dessert wine at retail for consumption off the licensed premises.

“Table wine” shall mean any alcoholic beverage containing not more than sixteen percent (16%) alcohol by volume obtained by the fermentation of the natural sugar content of fruits or other agricultural products containing sugar whether or not other ingredients are added.

“Theater” means a room, place or outside structure for performances or readings of dramatic literature, plays or dramatic representations of an art form not in violation of any provision of Idaho law.

“Vintner” means a person who manufactures, bottles, or sells table wine or dessert wine to importers for resale within this state other than a licensed “winery” as herein defined.

“Wine” includes table wine and dessert wine, unless the context requires otherwise.

“Wine by the drink license” means a license to sell table wine or dessert wine by the individual glass or opened bottle at retail, for consumption on the premises only.

“Wine distributor’s license” means a license issued by the director to a person authorizing such person to distribute table wine or dessert wine to retailers within the state of Idaho.

“Wine importer’s license” means a license issued by the director to a person authorizing such person to import table wine or dessert wine into the state of Idaho and to sell and distribute such wines to a distributor.

“Winery” means a place, premises or establishment within the state of Idaho for the manufacture or bottling of table wine or dessert wine for sale. Two (2) or more wineries may use the same premises and the same equipment to manufacture their respective wines, to the extent permitted by federal law.

“Winery license” means a license issued by the director authorizing a person to maintain a winery.

All other words and phrases used in this chapter, the definitions of which are not herein given, shall be given their ordinary and commonly understood and accepted meanings.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 3, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 1, p. 281; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 62, p. 811; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 1, p. 530; am. 1987, ch. 169, § 2, p. 330; am. 1994, ch. 266, § 1, p. 823; am. 2000, ch. 469, § 72, p. 1450; am. 2003, ch. 111, § 5, p. 348; am. 2003, ch. 119, § 1, p. 362; am. 2004, ch. 318, § 3, p. 892; am. 2008, ch. 181, § 1, p. 546; am. 2009, ch. 23, § 54, p. 53; am. 2017, ch. 73, § 1, p. 184; am. 2019, ch. 76, § 1, p. 179; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 1, p. 12.

§ 23-1304. County option — Resolution of county commissioners — Order for election — Form of ballot — Effect of election or resolution.

There is hereby granted to the board of county commissioners of each of the several counties of this state the right and authority to permit the sale of table wine and/or dessert wine, as defined in this chapter, within the borders of the several counties of this state, which may be exercised in the following manner:

the board of county commissioners of each county of this state may, by resolution regularly adopted, provide that retail sale of table wine and/or dessert wine, as defined in this chapter, shall be permitted within the county, and upon a certification of such resolution to the director, a retail wine license shall thereafter be issued for premises within such county so long as such resolution remains in effect; or

the board of county commissioners of each of the several counties of this state may submit the question of permitting the sale of table wine and/or dessert wine at retail within the boundaries of the county to the electors of the county.

The board of county commissioners may make an order calling an election to be held, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, within said county in the manner provided by law for holding elections for county officers. All laws of the state of Idaho relating to the holding of elections for county officers shall apply to the holdings of the election provided for in this section, except where specifically modified herein.

Such election may also be called upon written petition of registered electors equal in number to twenty percent (20%) of the registered, qualified electors of the county for the last general election under the following conditions:

(a) The petition for such an election shall be in substantially the following form:

§ 23-1305. Restrictions — Authority of division preserved.

Wine, as defined in this act, may be manufactured, imported into this state, possessed, distributed and sold in this state in the manner and under the conditions prescribed in this act and not otherwise.

Nothing contained in this act shall prohibit the division from selling wine pursuant to the Idaho liquor act in any outlet of the division.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 5, p. 760; am. 2009, ch. 23, § 55, p. 53.

§ 23-1306. Licenses required — Application — Issuance or refusal.

Before any person shall manufacture, import into this state, bottle or broker for resale within this state, possess for resale, store and handle wine as a bonded wine warehouse, or distribute or sell wine within the state of Idaho, he shall apply to the director for a license. The application form shall be prescribed and furnished by the director and require that the applicant therein show that he possesses all of the qualifications and none of the disqualifications of a licensee. A person may apply for and receive a license as both a distributor and importer, if otherwise qualified therefor, and shall pay the license fee required pursuant to this chapter for each license. A winery licensed under this chapter shall also be considered as holding, for the purposes of selling a product processed and bottled by or for that winery, a current retail wine license and wine by the drink license for the licensed premises and for use at functions and events identified in section 23-1338, Idaho Code, and a current wine distributor’s and importer’s license, without further application or fee. If the director is satisfied that the applicant possesses the qualifications and none of the disqualifications for such license, he shall issue a license for each classification applied for, subject to the restrictions of and upon the conditions specified in this chapter. The license or licenses issued shall be at all times prominently displayed in the place of business of the licensee. If the director determines that the applicant is not properly qualified, he shall refuse to issue a license and shall forthwith so notify the applicant and shall return to the applicant with such notification, three-fourths (¾) of the license fee remitted with the application. A separate retail wine by the drink license, and wine distributor’s license shall be required for each premises. Provided, however, nothing herein shall prohibit a distributor or retailer or wine by the drink licensee from possessing licenses for more than one (1) premises.

A bonded wine warehouse licensed under this chapter shall solely be authorized to store and handle wine produced by vintners and wineries. A license applicant shall hold a federal permit for a bonded wine cellar and may be required to post a continuing wine tax bond of such an amount and in such a form as may be required prior to the issuance of a bonded wine warehouse license. All wine shipped to and from a bonded wine warehouse shall remain under bond and no tax imposed shall be due, unless the wine is removed from bond and delivered to a licensed distributor.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 6, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 2, p. 281; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 64, p. 811; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 2, p. 530; am. 1987, ch. 169, § 3, p. 330; am. 1993, ch. 333, § 1, p. 1232; am. 1994, ch. 244, § 1, p. 763; am. 2007, ch. 289, § 1, p. 821; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 2, p. 12.

§ 23-1307. Qualifications for retail wine license, wine by the drink license, bonded wine warehouse license, and distributor’s license.

No retail wine license, wine by the drink license, bonded wine warehouse license, or wine distributor’s license shall be issued to an applicant who at the time of making the application:

If a corporation, has not qualified as required by law to do business in the state of Idaho;

Has had a wine distributor’s license, retail wine license, wine by the drink license, bonded wine warehouse license, or wine importer’s license revoked by the director within three (3) years from the date of making such application;

Has been convicted of a violation of the laws of this state or of the United States governing the sale of alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer, within three (3) years from the date of making such application;

Has been convicted of a felony or been granted a withheld judgment following an adjudication of guilt of a felony within five (5) years from the date of making such application;

If an individual or partnership, either the individual or at least one (1) of the partners of a partnership is not nineteen (19) years of age or older.

Licensed wineries shall not be required to possess a retail beer license to sell wine on the winery’s original licensed premises or at locations other than the winery’s original licensed premises.

To determine qualification for a license, the director shall also cause an investigation that shall include a fingerprint-based criminal history check of the Idaho central criminal history database and the federal bureau of investigation criminal history database. Each person listed as an applicant on an initial application shall submit a full set of fingerprints and the fee to cover the cost of the criminal history background check for such person with the application.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 7, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 3, p. 281; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 65, p. 811; am. 1987, ch. 169, § 4, p. 330; am. 1992, ch. 315, § 4, p. 937; am. 1994, ch. 14, § 7, p. 20; am. 2001, ch. 284, § 4, p. 1014; am. 2010, ch. 87, § 1, p. 168; am. 2017, ch. 73, § 2, p. 184; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 3, p. 12.

§ 23-1307A. Wine by the drink establishment not allowed near churches or schools — Exceptions.

No wine by the drink license shall be issued for any place, where wine is sold or dispensed to be consumed on the premises, whether conducted for pleasure or profit, that is within three hundred (300) feet of any public school, church, or any other place of worship measured in a straight line to the nearest entrance to the licensed premises, except [that] with the approval of the governing body of the municipality; provided that this limitation shall not apply to any duly licensed premises that at the time of licensing did not come within the restricted area, but subsequent to licensing came therein.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1307A, as added by 1978, ch. 349, § 2, p. 913.

§ 23-1308. Qualifications for importer’s license.

No wine importer’s license shall be issued to an applicant who at the time of making the application:

Has not executed an agreement in writing with the director that such importer and every person employed by it or acting as its agents other than distributors and retailers, will faithfully comply with and observe all the provisions of the laws of the state of Idaho relating to the importation, sale and distribution of wine and all rules and regulations adopted by the director pursuant to this act;

Has had a wine distributor’s license, retail wine license, wine by the drink license or wine importer’s license, revoked by the director within three (3) years from the date of making such application;

Has been convicted of a violation of the laws of this state or of the United States governing the sale of alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer, within three (3) years from the date of making such application;

Has been convicted of a felony or been granted a withheld judgment following an adjudication of guilt of a felony within five (5) years from the date of making such application.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 8, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 4, p. 281; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 66, p. 811.

§ 23-1308A. Qualifications for winery license.

No winery license shall be issued to an applicant who at the time of making the application:

Has not executed an agreement in writing with the director that such winery and every person employed by it or acting as its agents other than distributors and retailers, will faithfully comply with and observe all the provisions of the laws of the state of Idaho relating to the manufacturing, sale and distribution of wine and all rules adopted by the director pursuant to this act;

Has had a winery license, a wine distributor’s license, retail wine license, wine by the drink license or wine importer’s license, revoked by the director within three (3) years from the date of making such application;

Has been convicted of a violation of the laws of this state or of the United States governing the sale of alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer, within three (3) years from the date of making such application;

Has been convicted of a felony or been granted a withheld judgment following an adjudication of guilt of a felony within five (5) years from the date of making such application.

To determine qualification for a license, the director shall cause an investigation which shall include a fingerprint-based criminal history check of the Idaho central criminal history database and the federal bureau of investigation criminal history database. Each person listed as an applicant on an initial application shall submit a full set of fingerprints and the fee to cover the cost of the criminal history background check for such person with the application.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1308A, as added by 1984, ch. 221, § 3, p. 530; am. 1987, ch. 169, § 5, p. 330; am. 1993, ch. 333, § 2, p. 1232; am. 2001, ch. 284, § 5, p. 1014.

§ 23-1309. Restrictions on importation and distribution.

No importer shall import wine into the state of Idaho for resale within the state to a destination other than the warehouse of a distributor within the state of Idaho. No distributor shall sell or distribute wine in this state except from stocks of wine which have been unloaded, stored and maintained in a warehouse or warehouses located within the state of Idaho and owned or used by such distributor in the conduct of his business as such. All records which a distributor is by law or rule required to maintain, shall be kept at his warehouse, or if such distributor shall have more than one (1) warehouse, then in the warehouse of such distributor which he shall designate as his principal warehouse within the state. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the existing rights of any person who, on and prior to January 1, 1996, was licensed as a distributor by the state of Idaho.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 9, p. 760; am. 1996, ch. 329, § 2, p. 1122.

§ 23-1309A. Shipment and receipt of wine authorized — Labeling requirement.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any holder of a winery license under section 23-1306, Idaho Code, or any person holding a license to manufacture wine in another state who obtains a wine direct shipper permit pursuant to this section may sell and ship up to twenty-four (24) nine-liter cases of wine annually directly to a resident of Idaho, who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, for the resident’s personal use and not for resale.

Before sending any shipment to a resident of Idaho, the wine direct shipper permit holder must:

File an application with the director;

Pay a fifty dollar ($50.00) annual registration fee if the winery is not currently licensed by the director;

Provide the director its Idaho winery license number or a true copy of its current alcoholic beverage license issued by another state;

Obtain from the director a wine direct shipper permit;

Register with the state tax commission for the payment of sales and use taxes and excise taxes on wine sold to residents of Idaho under the wine direct shipper permit.

A wine direct shipper permit authorizes the permit holder to do all of the following:

Sell and ship not more than twenty-four (24) nine-liter cases of wine annually to any person twenty-one (21) years of age or older for his or her personal use and not for resale;

Ship wine directly to a resident in this state only in compliance with subsections (8) and (9) of this section;

Report to the director, no later than January 31 of each year, the total amount of wine shipped during the preceding calendar year under the wine direct shipper permit;

If the permit holder is located outside this state, pay to the state tax commission all sales and use taxes, and excise taxes on sales to residents of Idaho under the wine direct shipper permit. For excise tax purposes, all wine sold pursuant to a direct shipper permit shall be deemed to be wine sold in this state;

Permit the director and the state tax commission to perform an audit of the wine direct shipper permit holder’s records upon request;

Be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the alcohol beverage control division [bureau] of the Idaho state police, or any other state agency and the Idaho courts concerning enforcement of this section and any related laws, rules or regulations.

A wine direct shipper permit holder located outside the state may annually renew its permit with the director by paying a twenty-five dollar ($25.00) renewal fee and providing the director a true copy of its current alcoholic beverage license issued in another state. A wine direct shipper permit holder located in Idaho shall renew its wine direct shipper permit in conjunction with its license to manufacture wine. All registration fees and renewal fees shall be shared equally by the state police and the state tax commission.

The director may enforce the requirements of this section by administrative proceedings or suspend or revoke a wine direct shipper permit, and the director may accept payment of an offer in compromise in lieu of suspension, such payments to be determined by rule promulgated by the director.

Sales and shipments of wine directly to consumers in Idaho from wine manufacturers in Idaho or in another state who do not possess a current wine direct shipper permit are prohibited. Any person who knowingly makes such a shipment is guilty of a misdemeanor.

A licensee who holds a license for the retail sale of wine for consumption off the licensed premises may ship not more than two (2) cases of wine, containing not more than nine (9) liters per case, per shipment, for personal use and not for resale, directly to a resident of another state if the state to which the wine is sent allows residents of this state to receive wine sent from that state without payment of additional state tax, fees or charges. The sale shall be considered to have occurred in this state.

The shipping container of any wine shipped under this section must be clearly labeled to indicate that the container contains alcoholic beverages and cannot be delivered to a person who is not at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

For wine shipped under this section to an Idaho resident, the delivery person shall:

Have the person who receives the wine shipment sign for it; and

Not make deliveries to anyone who is under twenty-one (21) years of age or to anyone who is visibly intoxicated; and

Keep the signature record for one (1) year.

Sales authorized under this section are sales made by a retailer who is not authorized to sell at wholesale or sales by a winery of wine produced or bottled by the winery.

The director and the state tax commission may promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this section and are authorized to exchange necessary information to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1309A, as added by 1992, ch. 236, § 1, p. 704; am. 2006, ch. 29, § 1, p. 89.

§ 23-1310. Storage or purchase by distributor — From whom purchased.

No distributor may store or purchase wine for purposes of storage or resale unless said wine has been received from persons holding a valid wine importer’s license, a valid wine distributor’s license, a valid winery license, or a valid bonded wine warehouse license.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 10, p. 760; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 4, p. 530; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 4, p. 12.

§ 23-1311. Sales by distributors — Restrictions.

No distributor may sell any wine produced, manufactured, imported, or bought by such distributor, for use within this state, except to the holder of a valid retail wine license or wine by the drink license, or valid wine distributor’s license or to the division. Provided however, any distributor may sell any wine produced, manufactured, imported, or bought by such distributor, for use within this state, to a bona fide employee of such distributor. No distributor shall permit, for a consideration, wine to be consumed upon the premises of the distributor.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 11, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 5, p. 281; am. 1988, ch. 164, § 1, p. 295; am. 1991, ch. 137, § 7, p. 320; am. 2009, ch. 23, § 56, p. 53.

§ 23-1312. By the drink liquor retailers may purchase from distributors.

Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, including but not limited to section 23-914, Idaho Code, the holder of a license for the retail sale of liquor by the drink as defined in chapter 9, title 23, Idaho Code, is hereby authorized to purchase wine from persons holding valid wine distributor’s licenses.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 12, p. 760.

§ 23-1313. Purchases by retailers.

No retailer shall purchase or receive wine for resale except from a distributor. Provided, however, that a retailer wholly owned and operated by a licensed winery, which retails exclusively the product of that winery, may receive wine for resale from that winery.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 13, p. 760; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 5, p. 530.

§ 23-1314. Records and inspection of wineries, importers, bonded wine warehouses, and distributors.

Every winery, distributor, bonded wine warehouse, and importer shall have, and notify the director of, a place of business within the state of Idaho.

Each winery, distributor and importer shall keep at its place of business a record of its imports into, and sales of wine within, the state of Idaho. The import record shall include the date and quantity of import and the identity of the import seller and the import carrier or transporter. The sale record shall consist of a copy of the monthly report to the state tax commission required pursuant to section 23-1322, Idaho Code. Each winery, distributor and importer shall keep the record of each sale or import for a period of four (4) years thereafter and shall, on or before the fifteenth day of each month, file the report with the director. The director may require such additional information to be included in such returns as shall assist him in determining whether or not such licensee is complying with this act and whether or not all taxes and fees provided for by this act are being fully paid.

Each bonded wine warehouse shall keep at its place of business a record of its storage and handling of wine. The record shall include the date and quantity of wine stored and handled for each vintner and winery, and the identity of the carrier or transporter handling and storing the wine.

The director shall have the right at any time to make an examination of each winery’s, distributor’s, bonded wine warehouse’s, and importer’s books, records and premises, and such other matters as may assist him in verifying the accuracy of such reports.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 14, p. 760; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 67, p. 811; am. 1984, ch. 105, § 2, p. 244; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 6, p. 530; am. 1999, ch. 129, § 2, p. 373; am. 2000, ch. 333, § 2, p. 1123; am. 2011, ch. 130, § 4, p. 363; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 5, p. 12.

§ 23-1315. License fees — County retail license fees — County license required for retailers.

Each importer shall pay to the state of Idaho an annual license fee of three hundred dollars ($300).

Each distributor shall pay to the state of Idaho an annual license fee of three hundred dollars ($300) for each separate warehouse used for the purpose of or in connection with the sale or distribution of wine within this state.

Each winery shall pay to the state an annual license fee of three hundred dollars ($300).

Each retailer and wine by the drink licensee shall pay to the state of Idaho an annual license fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each premises for which a license is issued for the sale of wine.

In addition to the fee required by subsection (d) of this section, each retailer and wine by the drink licensee shall pay an annual license fee of not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) to the county in which the licensed premises are located. If the licensed premises are located within the incorporated limits of a city, the licensee shall pay an annual license fee of not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) to such city. Each city and county within this state are hereby authorized and empowered to determine the license fees to be paid by each retailer and wine by the drink licensee licensed pursuant to the terms and conditions of this act. No wine license issued by the director shall authorize the sale of wine at retail unless such person possesses a county and city license as may be required by the governing board thereof.

Each bonded wine warehouse shall pay to the state of Idaho an annual license fee of three hundred dollars ($300) for each separate warehouse used for the sole purpose of the storage and handling of wine within the state of Idaho.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 15, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 6, p. 281; am. 1981, ch. 237, § 2, p. 477; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 7, p. 530; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 6, p. 12.

§ 23-1316. Expiration and renewal of licenses.

All licenses issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall expire at 1:00 o’clock a.m. on the first day of the renewal month which shall be determined by the director by administrative rule and shall be subject to annual renewal upon proper application. The director will determine the renewal month by county based on the number of current licenses within each county, distributing renewals throughout the licensing year. The director may adjust the renewal month to accommodate population increases. Each licensee will be issued a temporary license to operate until their renewal month has been determined. Thereafter, renewals will occur annually on their renewal month. Renewal applications for licenses accompanied by the required fee must be filed with the director on or before the first day of the designated renewal month. Any licensee holding a valid license who fails to file an application for renewal of the current license on or before the first day of the designated renewal month shall have a grace period of an additional thirty-one (31) days in which to file an application for renewal of the license. The licensee, however, shall not be permitted to engage in any activity authorized by the license during the thirty-one (31) day extended time period unless and until the license is renewed. Renewal of such licenses shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by the issuing authority. The renewal form shall be submitted, together with the required license fees, and an affidavit verifying that the information contained in the original application is unchanged, or if there are material changes, indicating such changes.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 16, p. 760; am. 2001, ch. 30, § 3, p. 43.

§ 23-1317. Transfer of licenses — Fee — Application for approval.

No winery license, wine distributor’s license, wine by the drink license, bonded wine warehouse license, or retail wine license may be transferred to another person, including an executor, administrator, or trustee in bankruptcy of the estate of the licensee, unless the transferee shall first have obtained the approval of the director to such transfer upon application containing the substantially same information required of an applicant for a winery license, wine distributor’s license, bonded wine warehouse license, or retail wine license, as the case may be. If the transferee possesses all of the qualifications and none of the disqualifications for such license, the director shall approve the transfer by issuing a license to the transferee. The fee for each transfer of a winery license, wine distributor’s license, wine by the drink license, bonded wine warehouse license, or a retail wine license shall be twenty dollars ($20.00), which fee shall accompany the application for transfer.

Application to transfer a winery license, wine distributor’s license, wine by the drink license, bonded wine warehouse license, or retail wine license from one location to another shall be made to the director on forms prescribed and furnished by the director. The director shall approve any such transfer upon submission of the application and receipt by the director of a transfer fee of twenty dollars ($20.00).

The director, in his discretion, may deny the transfer of a license during the pendency of any proceedings for suspension or revocation instituted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 17, p. 760; am. 1973, ch. 144, § 7, p. 281; am. 1974, ch. 27, § 68, p. 811; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 8, p. 530; am. 1991, ch. 28, § 3, p. 54; am. 2020, ch. 10, § 7, p. 12.

§ 23-1318. County and city regulatory ordinances authorized.

The governing board of any county or city within this state is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt such ordinances and resolutions as may be deemed necessary by the governing board of said county or city in the interests of public health and welfare or for the orderly, moral and responsible conduct of the business of selling and distributing wine within the boundaries of such city or county, including but not limited to hours, days, places and conditions of sale and advertising practices.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 18, p. 760.

§ 23-1319. Excise tax — Sales included — Refund for export sales — Refund for breakage or spoilage — Distribution of revenue.

Upon all wines sold by a distributor or winery to a retailer or consumer and upon all wines sold and shipped directly to Idaho state residents by an out-of-state wine manufacturer holding a wine direct shipper permit under section 23-1309A, Idaho Code, for use within the state of Idaho pursuant to this chapter there is hereby imposed an excise tax of forty-five cents (45¢) per gallon. Sales of wine by a distributor or winery for the purpose of and resulting in export of wine from this state for resale outside this state shall be exempt from the taxes on wine imposed by this chapter.

Every sale of wine by a distributor to a retailer shall constitute a sale of wine for resale or consumption in this state, whether the sale is made within or without this state, and the distributor shall be liable for the payment of taxes. In every sale of wine by a winery through any of its licensed retail outlets, the winery shall be liable for payment of taxes imposed by this section.

When wine has been destroyed by breakage or has spoiled or otherwise become unfit for beverage purposes prior to payment of taxes on it, the distributor, upon satisfactory proof of destruction or spoilage, shall be entitled to deduct from existing inventories, subject to tax, the amount of wine so destroyed or spoiled.

If the state tax commission determines that any amount due under this chapter has been paid more than once or has been erroneously or illegally collected or computed, the commission shall set forth that fact in its records and the excess amount paid or collected may be credited on any amount then due and payable to the commission from that person and any balance refunded to the person by whom it was paid or to his successors, administrators or executors. The commission is authorized and the state board of tax appeals is authorized to order the commission in proper cases to credit or refund such amounts whether or not the payments have been made under protest and certify the refund to the state board of examiners.

No credit or refund shall be allowed or made after three (3) years from the time the payment was made, unless before the expiration of that period a claim is filed by the taxpayer. The three (3) year period allowed by this subsection for making refunds or credit claims shall not apply in cases where the state tax commission asserts a deficiency of tax imposed by law, and taxpayers desiring to appeal or otherwise seek a refund of amounts paid in obedience to deficiencies must do so within the time limits elsewhere prescribed by law.

All revenue received pursuant to this chapter shall be distributed as follows:

An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account sufficient to pay current refund claims as authorized in subsection (c) of this section and those moneys are continuously appropriated.

The balance remaining after distributing the amount in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be distributed as follows:

Twelve percent (12%) shall be distributed to the substance abuse treatment fund which is created in section 23-408, Idaho Code;

Five percent (5%) shall be distributed to the Idaho grape growers and wine producers commission account; and
(iii) The remainder shall be distributed to the general account [fund].

Any person who is not a distributor or winery but who makes, whether as principal, agent or broker, any sales of wine not otherwise taxed under this section and not exempt from such tax, shall be liable for payment of taxes imposed by this section. This subsection shall not impose tax on wine sold pursuant to section 23-1336, Idaho Code.

History.

1971, ch. 156, § 19, p. 760; am. 1980, ch. 239, § 5, p. 554; am. 1980, ch. 391, § 2, p. 993; am. 1984, ch. 105, § 1, p. 244; am. 1984, ch. 221, § 9, p. 530; am. 1984, ch. 283, § 1, p. 656; am. 1986, ch. 73, § 5, p. 201; am. 1988, ch. 156, § 1, p. 282; am. 1990, ch. 18, § 1, p. 30; am. 1994, ch. 243, § 1, p. 762; am. 2006, ch. 29, § 2, p. 89; am. 2007, ch. 141, § 6, p. 407; am. 2013, ch. 23, § 1, p. 44.

§ 23-1320. Security for tax.

The state tax commission, whenever it deems it necessary to insure compliance with this act, may require any person subject to this act to place with it such security as it may determine. The amount of the necessary security shall be fixed by the state tax commission but, except as provided hereafter, shall not be greater than three (3) times the estimated average monthly amount payable by such persons pursuant to this act. In the case of persons habitually delinquent in their obligations under this act, the amount of the security shall not be greater than five (5) times the estimated average monthly amount payable by such persons pursuant to this act. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased by the state tax commission at any time, subject to the limitations set forth herein.

The state tax commission may sell the security at public auction or, in the case of security in the form of bearer bonds issued by the United States or the state of Idaho which have a prevailing market price, at a private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price if it becomes necessary to make such sale in order to recover any tax, interest or penalties due on any amount required to be collected. Notice of the sale must be given to the person who deposited the security at least ten (10) days before the sale. Such notice may be given personally or by mail addressed to the person at the address furnished to the state tax commission and as it appears in the records of the state tax commission. Upon such sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

History.

I.C.,§ 23-1320, as added by 1988, ch. 182, § 4, p. 319.

§ 23-1321. Penalty and interest on excise tax

Waiver for justifiable delay in payment. [Repealed.]